District of Columbia statutes.
1-815.04

Treatment of misappropriation of fund amounts as Federal crime.

The provisions of § 664 of Title 18, United States Code (relating to theft or embezzlement from employee benefit plans), shall apply to the Trust Fund and the Federal Supplemental Fund.

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 729, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11074
This section is referenced in § 1-817.06.
1981 Ed., § 1-768.4.